Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑4] Prohibition in
enclosed or partially enclosed places of employment. Smoking shall be
prohibited in all enclosed or partially enclosed areas of places of employment.
[L 2006, c 295, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next